Illinois, session 104th, SB3351.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-2.5-15 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.5-15)7    Sec. 3-2.5-15. Department of Juvenile Justice; assumption 8of duties of the Juvenile Division.9    (a) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall assume the 10rights, powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Juvenile 11Division of the Department of Corrections. Personnel, books, 12records, property, and unencumbered appropriations pertaining 13to the Juvenile Division of the Department of Corrections 14shall be transferred to the Department of Juvenile Justice on 15the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General 16Assembly. Any rights of employees or the State under the 17Personnel Code or any other contract or plan shall be 18unaffected by this transfer.19    (b) Department of Juvenile Justice personnel who are hired 20by the Department on or after the effective date of this 21amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly and who 22participate or assist in the rehabilitative and vocational 23training of delinquent youths, supervise the daily activities   SB3351- 2 -LRB104 18778 RLC 32221 b1involving direct and continuing responsibility for the youth's 2security, welfare and development, or participate in the 3personal rehabilitation of delinquent youth by training, 4supervising, and assisting lower level personnel who perform 5these duties must: (1) be over the age of 21 and (2) have a 6high school diploma or equivalent and either (A) a bachelor's 7or advanced degree from an accredited college or university or 8(B) 2 or more years of experience providing direct care to 9youth in the form of residential care, coaching, case 10management, or mentoring. This requirement shall not apply to 11security, clerical, food service, and maintenance staff that 12do not have direct and regular contact with youth. The degree 13requirements specified in this subsection (b) are not required 14of persons who provide vocational training and who have 15adequate knowledge in the skill for which they are providing 16the vocational training.17    (c) Subsection (b) of this Section does not apply to 18personnel transferred to the Department of Juvenile Justice on 19the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General 20Assembly.21    (c-1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) or 22any other law to the contrary, any person serving as a guard of 23youth at a Department of Juvenile Justice Youth Center must: 24(1) be over the age of 21 and (2) have a high school diploma or 25equivalent. No social work experience or college education is 26required to serve as a guard of youth at a Department of   SB3351- 3 -LRB104 18778 RLC 32221 b1Juvenile Justice Youth Center. 2    (d) The Department shall be under the direction of the 3Director of Juvenile Justice as provided in this Code.4    (e) The Director shall organize divisions within the 5Department and shall assign functions, powers, duties, and 6personnel as required by law. The Director may create other 7divisions and may assign other functions, powers, duties, and 8personnel as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the 9functions and responsibilities vested by law in the 10Department. The Director may, with the approval of the Office 11of the Governor, assign to and share functions, powers, 12duties, and personnel with other State agencies such that 13administrative services and administrative facilities are 14provided by a shared administrative service center. Where 15possible, shared services which impact youth should be done 16with child-serving agencies. These administrative services may 17include, but are not limited to, all of the following 18functions: budgeting, accounting related functions, auditing, 19human resources, legal, procurement, training, data collection 20and analysis, information technology, internal investigations, 21intelligence, legislative services, emergency response 22capability, statewide transportation services, and general 23office support.24    (f) The Department of Juvenile Justice may enter into 25intergovernmental cooperation agreements under which minors 26adjudicated delinquent and committed to the Department of   SB3351- 4 -LRB104 18778 RLC 32221 b1Juvenile Justice may participate in county juvenile impact 2incarceration programs established under Section 3-6039 of the 3Counties Code.4    (g) The Department of Juvenile Justice must comply with 5the ethnic and racial background data collection procedures 6provided in Section 4.5 of the Criminal Identification Act. 7    (h) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall implement a 8wellness program to support health and wellbeing among staff 9and service providers within the Department of Juvenile 10Justice environment. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall 11establish response teams to provide support to employees and 12staff affected by events that are both duty-related and not 13duty-related and provide training to response team members. 14The Department's wellness program shall be accessible to any 15Department employee or service provider, including contractual 16employees and approved volunteers. The wellness program may 17include information sharing, education and activities designed 18to support health and well-being within the Department's 19environment. Access to wellness response team support shall be 20voluntary and remain confidential.21    (i) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall collaborate 22with the Department of Human Services and other State agencies 23to develop and implement screening and follow-up protocols for 24intake and aftercare personnel on identification and response 25to children and adolescents who show indications of being 26victims of human trafficking or at risk of human trafficking.   SB3351- 5 -LRB104 18778 RLC 32221 b1Protocols should include assessment and provision of 2pre-release and post-release housing, legal, medical, mental 3health, and substance use disorder treatment services and 4recognize the specialized needs of victims of human 5trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation.6    (j) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall require the 7juvenile justice system to provide access to specialized 8services for identified trafficked children and youth. In this 9subsection, "specialized services" means substance-use 10disorder, mental health, medical and other support services by 11Department employees and contractors who have completed 12victim-centered, trauma-informed training specifically 13designed to address the complex psychological and physical 14needs of victims of human trafficking, sexual exploitation, 15and involvement in the sex trade.16    (k) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall require 17statewide training for juvenile justice agencies and their 18direct service personnel on identification and response to 19child trafficking. 20(Source: P.A. 103-290, eff. 7-28-23; 104-159, eff. 1-1-26.)